Missouri, session 2026, HB3174.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 160.663, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 160.073 and 160.663, to read as follows:
160.073. 1. (1) Subject to appropriations, beginning in the 2027-28 school year
and for each subsequent school year, each school district or charter school shall
implement a wearable panic alert system capable of connecting diverse emergency
services technologies to ensure real-time coordination between multiple emergency
response agencies. Such system, which may be known as "Alyssa's Law", shall integrate
with local public safety answering point infrastructure to transmit 911 calls and mobile
activations.
(2) A school district or charter school shall provide each school employee with a
wearable panic alert device that allows the school employee to communicate with others
inside the school building and immediately contact local emergency response agencies.
(3) The wearable panic alert system shall be capable of initiating an emergency
notification throughout the school district or charter school. Notifications shall include:
(a) Automated visual strobes whose colors map to the emergency protocol;
(b) An automated, direct connection to the intercom or public announcement
infrastructure in place that maps to the emergency protocol; and
(c) An automated computer display takeover message that maps to the
emergency protocol.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3174 2
(4) Upon activation of an alert through the panic alert system, the wearable
panic alert device shall provide accurate location information at the room and floor
level inside the school building and to other specific areas, including parking lots,
playgrounds, and athletic fields, that are part of the school grounds.
(5) A school district or charter school shall ensure, before the school year begins,
all school employees receive training on the emergency protocols and appropriate use of
the wearable panic alert device described in this subsection.
2. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Allysa Alhadeff Fund",
which shall consist of any appropriations to the fund and any gifts, donations,
contributions, grants, or bequests received from private or other sources. The state
treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180,
the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and,
upon appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely for the administration of
this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
3. The state board of education may adopt rules to implement this section as are
necessary to protect the health and safety of students and educators. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after the effective date of this
section shall be invalid and void.
4. The department of elementary and secondary education shall create a list of
qualified vendors for the panic alert system.
160.663. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Anti-intruder door lock", a mechanical or electronic door-locking mechanism on
an interior door that is designed to keep an intruder from entering an interior room that shall:
(a) Be capable of:
a. Locking from inside or outside the room;

HCS HB 3174 3
b. Unlocking from outside the room with a key or other approved means; and
(b) Control access to the room;
(2) "Exterior door or entryway", any location of normal ingress and egress into or out
of a school building;
(3) "Interior door", an egress door from a classroom, office, or other occupied room
that provides access to the interior of a building;
(4) "Master key box", an exterior secure master key box that meets the standards
prescribed under Underwriters Laboratories Standard 1037 for use by fire protection and law
enforcement.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, each school district and charter school
shall equip each interior door with an anti-intruder door lock.
3. (1) A school district or charter school may equip each school with one or more
master key boxes to contain the necessary keys and access tools for fire protection and law
enforcement agencies to gain access to exterior or interior doors or entryways, including those
equipped with an anti-intruder door lock required under this section.
(2) On or before July 1, 2028, a school district or charter school shall equip each
school with at least one master key box as provided in subsections 7 to 10 of this section.
4. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, a school district or
charter school shall not be required to equip an interior door with an anti-intruder door lock
under this section unless the general assembly specifically appropriates moneys to cover all
costs related to equipping such door or entryway with such lock.
5. (1) Each interior door installed after August 28, 2029, shall be equipped with the
required anti-intruder door lock.
(2) A school district or charter school may receive donations of master key boxes and
moneys for the purchase of master key boxes.
(3) A school district or charter school may receive donations of anti-intruder door
locks and moneys for the purchase of anti-intruder door locks.
6. Before or in conjunction with equipping interior doors with anti-intruder door
locks, each school district and charter school shall develop and implement school building
access policies and practices that control access to individual classrooms.
7. On or before July 1, 2028, each school district and charter school shall install
at each school at least one master key box. Each master key box shall be installed at an
appropriate location to permit law enforcement officers emergency access to each
building and classroom or other room on the school grounds. The school district or
charter school shall determine the precise location of each key box after consultation
with local law enforcement agencies of the jurisdiction in which the school building is
located. Each school district or charter school shall provide each local law enforcement

HCS HB 3174 4
agency of the jurisdiction in which the school building is located with a key or access
code that permits access to the contents of the master key box.
8. Each master key box installed pursuant to subsection 7 of this section shall
contain:
(1) The keys and other access control devices necessary to access each building
and room on the entire school grounds; and
(2) Accurate maps of the entire school grounds that identify and label:
(a) Access points to each building's interior, including rooms, doors, stairwells,
and hallways. The maps shall include the identifiers or names utilized by staff and
students to identify the rooms, doors, stairwells, and hallways on the map;
(b) Locations of critical utilities, master key boxes, automated external
defibrillators, trauma kits, and other emergency response aids; and
(c) Areas at or near each building, including parking areas, athletic fields,
surrounding roads, outbuildings, and neighboring properties.
9. Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 610 to the contrary, the contents of
a master key box and the information contained therein is not a public record and shall
not be made available for public examination.
10. An employee of a school district or charter school is immune from civil
liability for damages arising out of the installation and use of master key boxes required
by this section unless the employee acted with gross negligence or bad faith.
✔